Arkansas, session 2025, SB108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the SAU-Tech for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor, SAUT 1 $208,138
(2) IT Pool 6
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
*HAR022*
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(3) Vice-Chan. for Instruction 1 $167,057
(4) Vice-Chan. for Dev. & Ext. Ed. 1 $156,658
(5) Vice-Chan. for Finance 1 $156,658
(6) Vice-Chan. for Information Tech 1 $156,658
(7) Vice-Chan. for Student Services 1 $156,658
(8) Director of Human Resources 1 $132,733
(9) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,733
(10) Counselor 1 $127,508
(11) Registrar 1 $122,249
(12) Director of Student Financial Aid 1 $122,005
(13) Project/Program Administrator 1
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(14) Director of Computer Services 1 $119,967
(15) Controller 1 $117,181
(16) Director of Development 1 $113,455
(17) Director of Cont. Ed/Business Outreach 1 $113,455
(18) Director of Physical Plant 1 $113,103
(19) Director of Admissions 1 $111,453
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
(20) Coordinator of Student Recruitment 2 $111,362
(21) Director of Special Programs 3 $111,361
(22) Assistant to the Chancellor 1 $104,457
(23) Dir. of Student Activities/Org. 1 $101,944
(24) Communications Coordinator 1 $101,944
(25) Fiscal Support Pool 3
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(26) Public Safety Pool 4
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(27) Maintenance Manager 1 $85,136
(28) Payroll Services Coordinator 1 $78,713
(29) Procurement Coordinator 1 $78,713
(30) Academic Advisor 2 $77,183
(31) Research and Statistics Manager 1 $75,685
(32) Skilled Trades Pool 6
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(33) Assistant Director of Financial Aid 1 $72,774
(34) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
(35) Buyer 1 $69,975
(36) Administrative Support Pool 22
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(37) Assistant Registrar 1 $67,284
(38) Financial Aid Analyst 1 $67,284
(39) Library Support Pool 3
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(40) Payroll Services Specialist 1 $67,284
(41) Statistician 1 $64,696
(42) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(43) Residential Advisor 1 $57,515
(44) Landscape Specialist 1 $55,302
(45) Warehouse Specialist 1 $55,302
(46) Admissions Analyst 1 $53,175
(47) Maintenance Assistant 6 $51,130
(48) Institutional Services Supervisor 1 $43,706
(49) Institutional Services Assistant 4 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
(50) Division Chairperson 2 $146,201
(51) Librarian 1 $132,733
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(52) Faculty 41 $111,362
(53) Part-Time Faculty 71 $56,046
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(54) Athletic Administration & Support Pool 9
Coach $104,891
Asst. Coach $56,046
Athletic Trainer $41,956
CAREER ACADEMY
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(55) Director, SAUT Career Academy 1 $111,361
(56) Academic Counselor 1 $94,342
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(57) Director of Adult Education 1 $127,510
(58) Faculty 12 $111,362
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(59) Assistant Bookstore Manager 1 $59,815
(60) Cashier 1 $51,130
(61) Institutional Services Assistant 2 $42,025
FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(62) IT Pool 1
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(63) Director 1 $136,774
(64) Deputy Director 1 $108,186
(65) Fiscal Support Pool 1
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(66) Administrative Support Pool 10
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(67) Maintenance Assistant 2 $51,130
(68) Institutional Services Assistant 1 $42,025
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(69) Assistant Director for Training 1 $114,452
(70) Faculty 21 $111,362
(71) Satellite Center Coordinator 1 $102,135
(72) Part-Time Faculty 25 $56,046
ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING ACADEMY
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(73) Director 1 $120,046
(74) Assistant Director for Training 1 $114,452
(75) Administrative Support Pool 3
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(76) Maintenance Assistant 1 $51,130
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(77) Faculty 7 $111,362
(78) Part-Time Faculty 12 $56,046
ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING ACADEMY
STATEWIDE SOLID WASTE PROGRAM
PURSUANT TO ACT 1850 OF 2005
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(79) Stwd. Solid Waste Trng. Inst. Coor. 1 $70,639
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 333

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the SAU-Tech for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one hundred seventy-five (175)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the SAU-Tech Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the SAU-Tech for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,885,005
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 959,357
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 907,411
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 50,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTINGENCY 292,589
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,144,362

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code
19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the SAU-Tech for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,213,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 180,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,100,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,500,000
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 200,000
(C) PROF. FEES 400,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,300,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 2,000,000
(06) DEBT SERVICE 375,000
(07) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 600,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $13,868,000

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY. There is hereby
authorized, for the SAU-Tech - Fire Training Academy the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: fifty-five (55) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY.
There is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the SAU-
Tech Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the SAU-Tech -
Fire Training Academy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $969,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 424,592
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,043,592
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY.
There is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the SAU-
Tech Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the SAU-Tech -
Fire Training Academy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PERSONAL SERVICES AND OPERATING
EXPENSES $3,045,637

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY. There
is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the SAU-Tech - Fire Training Academy for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $265,200
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 80,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 300,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 65,000
(C) PROF. FEES 85,751
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 120,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $915,951

SECTION 9. EXTRA HELP - ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING ACADEMY. There is
hereby authorized, for the SAU-Tech - Environmental Training Academy for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: fifty (50) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING
ACADEMY. There is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from
the SAU-Tech Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the SAU-
Tech - Environmental Training Academy for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $229,500
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 45,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 151,307
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $455,807

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING
ACADEMY. There is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from
cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses of the SAU-Tech - Environmental Training Academy for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $242,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 119,900
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 165,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 30,000
(C) PROF. FEES 11,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 55,000
01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022

SB108
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 55,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $677,900

SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

01/27/2025 9:59:42 AM HAR022